Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. LOCAL ORGANIZATION AND GOVERNANCE

CHAPTER 13. CREATION, CONSOLIDATION, AND ABOLITION OF A DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 13.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "membership" means the number of students enrolled in a school district as of a given date.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.002. PERMITTED FREQUENCY OF PROPOSED ACTIONS. (a) If at an election on a proposition under this chapter the majority of the votes are cast against the proposition, another election for the same purpose may not be held earlier than the corresponding uniform election date three years after the date of the first election. If a majority of the votes are cast in favor of the proposition, an election to reverse the effects of the first election may not be held earlier than the corresponding uniform election date three years after the date of the first election.

(b) If, without an election, an action under this chapter occurs on the order or ordinance of an authority acting in response to a petition and the petitioners' request is rejected, that authority may not consider a subsequent petition on the same request earlier than three years after the date on which the request is rejected. If the request is granted and the order is issued or the ordinance is adopted, a petition to reverse the effects of the order or ordinance may not be considered by the authority earlier than three years after the date of issuance or adoption.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.003. PETITION AND ELECTION. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this section governs:

(1) the validity of a petition submitted to request an election under this chapter; and

(2) the conduct of the resulting election.

(b) To be valid, a petition must:

(1) be submitted to the county judge serving the county in which the appropriate school district is located;

(2) be signed by at least 10 percent of the registered voters of the appropriate district; and

(3) state the purpose for which it is being submitted.

(c) Immediately following receipt of a valid petition, the county judge shall order the election to be held on an authorized election date, as prescribed by Chapter 41, Election Code, occurring not later than the 60th day after the date of receipt. If an authorized date within that period does not allow sufficient time to comply with other legal requirements or if there is no authorized date within that period, the election shall be ordered for the next authorized date.

(d) The election order must include the date of the election, the hours during which the polls will be open, the location of the polling places, and the proposition to be voted on.

(e) Not earlier than the 30th day or later than the 10th day before the date of the election, the county judge shall give notice of the election by having a copy of the election order published at least once in a newspaper published at least once each week in the appropriate school district. If such a newspaper is not published in the district, the notice shall be published in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district is located. The county judge shall give additional notice of the election by having a copy of the election order posted in a public place in each election precinct not later than the 21st day before the date of the election.

(f) The election precincts and polling places usually used in the elections of the appropriate school district shall be used in an election held under this chapter, except that if another election is occurring on the same date for all or part of the same geographic area, precincts and polling places shall be selected to allow each voter to cast ballots at the same polling place for each of the elections. To the extent practical, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Code.

(g) The expenses of the election shall be paid by the appropriate school district or districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.004. ALLOCATION OF INDEBTEDNESS AND PERSONAL PROPERTY. (a) If under this chapter a school district assumes a portion of the indebtedness of another district, the commissioners court by order shall equitably allocate the indebtedness among the districts involved. If territory from one district is annexed to another or if a district is abolished, the commissioners court shall also equitably allocate among the receiving districts a portion of the personal property of the annexed district or all the personal property of an abolished district. If districts located in more than one county are involved, the commissioners court of each county in which an involved school district is located must agree on the allocation of indebtedness and personal property.

(b) In allocating the indebtedness and personal property, the commissioners court shall consider the value of the properties involved and the taxable value of the districts involved.

(c) The order of the commissioners court is binding on the school districts and territory affected by the order.

(d) A school district required to assume the indebtedness of another district under this chapter is not required to conduct an election on assumption of the indebtedness. Without an election, the school district assuming the indebtedness may levy and collect taxes necessary to pay principal and interest on the assumed debt so long as the debt is outstanding.

(e) Without an election, a school district may issue refunding bonds for bonds of another district assumed under this chapter.

(f) If an entire district is annexed to or consolidated with another district, if a district is converted from a common to an independent school district, or if a school district is separated from a municipality, the governing board of the district as changed may, without an election, sell and deliver any unissued bonds voted in the district before the change and may levy and collect taxes in the district as changed for the payment of principal and interest on bonds.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.005. EFFECTIVE DATE OF TRANSFER. (a) Except as provided by this section or by a local consolidation agreement under Section 13.158, the annexation of all or part of the territory of one district to another is effective on the first July 1 that is more than 30 days after the date of the order or ordinance accomplishing the annexation or of the declaration of the results of an election at which the transfer is approved.

(b) On the effective date of the transfer:

(1) students residing in the territory become residents of the receiving district;

(2) title to property allocated to the receiving district vests in the district;

(3) the receiving district assumes any debt allocated to it; and

(4) the receiving district assumes jurisdiction of the annexed territory for all other purposes.

(c) If the annexation is appealed to the commissioner and is approved, the transfer is effective on a date set by the commissioner that is not earlier than the 30th day after the date of the commissioner's decision in the appeal. If the decision of the commissioner is appealed to a district court in Travis County, the transfer, if approved, is effective on a date set by the court.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.006. TAXING AUTHORITY TRANSFER. (a) If all or part of the territory of a school district is annexed to another district, the receiving district may levy taxes at the rate established in accordance with law for the district as a whole and is not required to conduct an election for the purpose of taxing the territory received.

(b) Conversion of a common school district or rural high school district to an independent school district or separation from municipal control does not affect the taxes levied for school purposes. The new district may levy and collect taxes at the same rate at which the taxes were previously levied and is not required to conduct an election for that purpose.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.008. DISTRICT TRUSTEE APPROVAL OF BOUNDARY CHANGES REQUIRED. Any change in the boundaries of a school district is not effective unless approved by a majority of the board of trustees of the district if the board's approval is required under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.009. APPEALS. (a) A decision of a commissioners court under this chapter may be appealed for a de novo review.

(b) If this chapter requires the agreement of or action by two or more commissioners courts, and the commissioners courts fail to agree or take action within a reasonable time set by rule of the State Board of Education, a person aggrieved by the failure may appeal to the commissioner for resolution of the issue.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.010. BOUNDARY DESCRIPTIONS AND MAPS TO BE FILED WITH AGENCY. (a) Each school district shall file with the agency:

(1) a complete and legally sufficient description of the boundaries of the district;

(2) a map of the district that:

(A) is drawn to the county general highway maps produced by the Texas Department of Transportation or a similar map of sufficient detail to display the names of visible features that the boundaries follow or to which the boundaries are in close proximity; and

(B) is an accurate and legible representation of the boundaries in relationship to other features on the map; and

(3) a list of voting precincts in the district, separately listing those precincts wholly in the district and those precincts only partly in the district.

(b) A school district shall amend the information and maps on file under this section if the boundaries of the district change or if any other change makes the information on file incomplete or inaccurate.

(c) The agency shall make maps and information maintained under this section available to the legislature and legislative agencies without cost.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. DETACHMENT; ANNEXATION

Sec. 13.051. DETACHMENT AND ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY. (a) In accordance with this section, territory may be detached from a school district and annexed to another school district that is contiguous to the detached territory. A petition requesting the detachment and annexation must be presented to the board of trustees of the district from which the territory is to be detached and to the board of trustees of the district to which the territory is to be annexed. Each board of trustees to which a petition is required to be presented must conduct a hearing and adopt a resolution as provided by this section for the annexation to be effective.

(b) The petition requesting detachment and annexation must:

(1) be signed by a majority of:

(A) the registered voters residing in the territory to be detached and annexed, if the territory has residents; or

(B) the surface owners of taxable property in the territory to be detached and annexed, if the territory does not have residents; and

(2) give the metes and bounds of the territory to be detached and annexed.

(c) Territory that does not have residents may be detached from a school district and annexed to another school district if:

(1) the total taxable value of the property in the territory according to the most recent certified appraisal roll for each school district is not greater than:

(A) five percent of the district's taxable value of all property in that district as determined under Subchapter M, Chapter 403, Government Code; and

(B) $5,000 property value per student in average daily attendance as determined under Section 48.005; and

(2) the school district from which the property will be detached does not own any real property located in the territory.

(d) The proposed annexation must be approved by the board of trustees of each affected district, subject to the appeal provisions of Subsection (j).

(e) Unless the petition is signed by a majority of the trustees of the district from which the territory is to be detached, territory that has residents may not be detached from a school district under this section if detachment would reduce that district's tax base by a ratio at least twice as large as the ratio by which it would reduce its membership. The first ratio is determined by dividing the assessed value of taxable property in the affected territory by the assessed value of all taxable property in the district, both figures according to the preceding year's tax rolls. The second ratio is determined by dividing the number of students residing in the affected territory by the number of students residing in the district as a whole, using membership on the last day of the preceding school year and the students' places of residence as of that date.

(f) A school district may not be reduced to an area of less than nine square miles.

(g) Immediately following receipt of the petition as required by this section, each affected board of trustees shall give notice of the contemplated change by publishing and posting a notice in the manner required for an election order under Section 13.003. The notice must specify the place and date at which a hearing on the matter shall be held. Unless the districts hold a joint hearing, the districts must hold hearings on separate dates. At each hearing, affected persons are entitled to an opportunity to be heard.

(h) At the hearing, each board of trustees shall consider the educational interests of the current students residing or future students expected to reside in the affected territory and in the affected districts and the social, economic, and educational effects of the proposed boundary change. After the conclusion of the hearing, each board of trustees shall make findings as to the educational interests of the current students residing or future students expected to reside in the affected territory and in the affected districts and as to the social, economic, and educational effects of the proposed boundary change and shall, on the basis of those findings, adopt a resolution approving or disapproving the petition. The findings and resolution shall be recorded in the minutes of each affected board of trustees and shall be reported to the commissioners court of the county to which the receiving district is assigned for administrative purposes by the agency and to the commissioners court of the county to which the district from which territory is to be detached is assigned for administrative purposes.

(i) If both boards of trustees of the affected districts approve the petition, the commissioners court or commissioners courts to whom the matter is required to be reported shall enter an order redefining the boundaries of the districts affected by the transfer. Title to all real property of the district from which territory is detached within the territory annexed vests in the receiving district, and the receiving district assumes and is liable for any portion of the indebtedness of the district from which the territory is to be detached that is allocated to the receiving district under Section 13.004.

(j) If both boards of trustees of the affected districts disapprove the petition, the decisions may not be appealed. If the board of trustees of only one affected district disapproves the petition, an aggrieved party to the proceedings in either district may appeal the board's decision to the commissioner under Section 7.057. An appeal under this subsection is de novo. In deciding the appeal, the commissioner shall consider the educational interests of the students in the affected territory and the affected districts and the social, economic, and educational effects of the proposed boundary change.

(k) Any additional tax resulting from a change of use, as provided for by Chapter 23, Tax Code, and the interest and penalty on the additional tax, that is imposed for any year on land in the annexed territory shall be paid to the school district that imposed the tax.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.010, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 13.052. DORMANT SCHOOL DISTRICTS. (a) If the commissioner determines that a school district has failed to operate a school for a full school year, the commissioner shall report to each appropriate commissioners court that the district is dormant.

(b) The commissioners court of a county shall by order annex each dormant school district within the county with an adjoining district or districts. If the dormant district is a county-line district, the commissioners court of each county in which the district is located shall annex the territory of the dormant district that is within that county. The commissioners court may annex territory to a school district only if the board of trustees of that district approves the annexation.

(c) The governing board of the district to which a dormant school district is annexed is the governing board for the new district.

(d) The order of the commissioners court shall define by legal boundary description the territory of the new district as enlarged and shall be recorded in the minutes of the commissioners court.

(e) Title to the real property of the dormant district vests in the district to which the property is annexed. Each district to which territory is annexed assumes and is liable for any portion of the dormant district's indebtedness that is allocated to the receiving district under Section 13.004.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.053. TERRITORY NOT IN SCHOOL DISTRICT. (a) All real property must be included within the limits of a school district. At any time it is determined that there is territory located in a county but not within the described limits of a school district, the commissioners court shall annex the territory to one or more adjoining districts.

(b) The annexation order shall define by legal boundary description the territory of the new district and shall be recorded in the minutes of the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.054. ACADEMICALLY UNACCEPTABLE SCHOOL DISTRICTS. (a) The commissioner by order may annex to one or more adjoining districts a school district that has been rated as academically unacceptable for a period of two years.

(b) The governing board of a district to which territory of an academically unacceptable district is annexed is the governing board for the new district.

(c) The order of the commissioner shall define by legal boundary description the territory of the new district as enlarged.

(d) Title to the real property of the academically unacceptable district vests in the district to which the property is annexed. Each district to which territory is annexed assumes and is liable for any portion of the academically unacceptable district's indebtedness that is allocated to the receiving district under Section 13.004.

(e) Before the commissioner orders an annexation under this section, the commissioner shall investigate the educational and financial impact of the annexation on the receiving district. The commissioner may order the annexation only if the commissioner finds that the annexation will not substantially impair the ability of the receiving district to educate the students located in the district before the annexation and to meet its financial obligations incurred before the annexation.

(f) For five years beginning with the school year in which the annexation occurs, a school district shall receive additional funding under this subsection or Subsection (h). The amount of funding shall be determined by multiplying the lesser of the enlarged district's local fund assignment computed under Section 48.256 or the enlarged district's total cost of tier one by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of students residing in the territory annexed to the receiving district preceding the date of the annexation and the denominator of which is the number of students residing in the district as enlarged on the date of the annexation, and multiplying the resulting product by the quotient of the enlarged district's maximum compressed tax rate, as determined under Section 48.2551, for the current school year divided by the receiving district's maximum compressed tax rate, as determined under Section 48.2551, for the year in which the annexation occurred.

(g) In order to assist with the costs of facility renovation, repair, and replacement, a district to which territory is annexed under this section is entitled to additional state aid for five years, beginning with the school year in which the annexation occurs. The commissioner shall determine the amount of additional state aid provided each year by dividing the amount of debt service taxes received by the district during the tax year preceding the tax year in which the annexation occurs by the number of students enrolled in the district immediately preceding the date of annexation, and multiplying that result by the number of additional students enrolled in the district on September 1 after the date of annexation. The commissioner shall provide additional state aid under this subsection from funds appropriated for purposes of the Foundation School Program. A determination by the commissioner under this subsection is final and may not be appealed.

(h) The commissioner may authorize a district to receive payments provided by Subchapter G, instead of Subsection (f), if the commissioner determines that would result in greater payments for the district. A determination by the commissioner is final and may not be appealed.

(i) The funding provided under Subsection (f), (g), or (h) is in addition to other funding the district receives through other provisions of this code, including Chapters 48 and 49.

(j) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (S.B. 1353), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (H.B. 21), Sec. 2, eff. November 14, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 1.003, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 1A.001, eff. September 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.011, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. CREATION OF DISTRICT BY DETACHMENT

Sec. 13.101. CREATION OF DISTRICT BY DETACHING TERRITORY FROM EXISTING DISTRICT. (a) A new school district may be created by detaching territory from an existing school district or existing contiguous school districts and establishing a new school district.

(b) A school district created under this subchapter has all the rights and privileges of other independent school districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.102. MINIMUM AREA AND ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS. A new district may not be created with an area of less than nine square miles or fewer than 8,000 students in average daily attendance, and a district may not be reduced to an area of less than nine square miles or fewer than 8,000 students in average daily attendance.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.103. INITIATION OF DETACHMENT. Creation of a new district by detachment is initiated by resolution of the board of trustees of each district from which territory is to be detached or by a petition presented to the commissioners court. A petition under this subchapter must:

(1) give the metes and bounds of the proposed new district;

(2) be signed by at least 10 percent of the registered voters residing in the proposed area to be detached from an existing district; and

(3) be addressed to the commissioners court of the county in which the territory of the proposed district is located or, if the territory is in more than one county, to the commissioners court of each county in which the territory is located.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.104. ELECTION. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the date the commissioners court receives a petition under this subchapter, the commissioners court shall hold a hearing on the validity of the petition. If the commissioners court determines the petition is valid, each board of trustees shall order an election to be held on the same date in each district.

(b) The ballot shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "Creation of a new school district that includes the following territory from the _________ School District: ___________________." The ballot description of the territory to be detached must be sufficient to give general notice of the territory affected.

(c) An election on the detachment of the territory and creation of a new district has no effect unless at least 25 percent of the registered voters of each district vote in the election in which the issue is on the ballot.

(d) The boards of trustees shall report the results of the election to the appropriate commissioners courts, which shall declare the results of the election. The new school district is created only if the proposition receives:

(1) a majority of the votes in the territory to be detached; and

(2) a majority of the votes in the remaining territory in each district from which property is to be detached in the manner prescribed by Section 13.003.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.105. CREATION OF DISTRICT. (a) If all the requirements of this subchapter are met, the commissioners court shall enter an order creating the new school district. If the new district contains territory in two or more counties, the order must be concurred in by the commissioners court of each county concerned.

(b) At the time the order creating the district is made, the commissioners court of the county in which the largest portion of the district's territory is located shall appoint a board of seven trustees for the new district to serve until the next regular election of trustees, when a board of trustees shall be elected in compliance with Chapter 11.

(c) Title to school district real property in the territory detached vests in the new district. The new district assumes and is liable for any portion of outstanding indebtedness of the district from which the territory was detached that is allocated to the new district under Section 13.004.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER D. CONSOLIDATION

Sec. 13.151. DISTRICTS THAT MAY CONSOLIDATE. (a) By the procedure provided by this subchapter, two or more school districts may consolidate into a single school district.

(b) The consolidated district may include area in more than one county.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.152. RESOLUTION OR PETITION. Consolidation is initiated in each district proposed to be consolidated by either a resolution adopted by the board of trustees of the district or a petition requesting an election on the question that is signed by the required number of registered voters of the district. Each district is not required to use the same method to initiate consolidation.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.1521. RECEIPT OR CONSIDERATION OF PETITION REQUESTING DETACHMENT AND ANNEXATION AFTER ADOPTION OF CONSOLIDATION RESOLUTIONS. If a resolution in favor of consolidation has been adopted by the board of trustees of each school district proposed to be consolidated into a particular single district, none of those boards of trustees may receive or consider a petition requesting detachment and annexation under Subchapter B without the consent of each of the other of those boards of trustees:

(1) before consolidation; or

(2) before consolidation is disapproved at an election under Section 13.153.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 336 (H.B. 2016), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 13.153. ELECTION ORDER; NOTICE. (a) Each board of trustees shall:

(1) issue an order for an election to be held on the same day in each district included in the proposed consolidated district; and

(2) give notice of the election.

(b) If no local consolidation agreement is submitted under Section 13.158, the ballot in the election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "Consolidation of (name of school districts) into a single school district."

(c) If a local consolidation agreement is submitted under Section 13.158, the ballot in the election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "Consolidation of (name of school districts) into a single school district under a local consolidation agreement."

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.154. CANVASS; RESULT. (a) Each board of trustees shall canvass the returns of the election in its district and shall publish the results separately for each district.

(b) If the votes cast in all districts show a majority in each district voting in favor of the consolidation, the board of trustees shall declare the school districts consolidated.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.155. STATUS; GOVERNANCE. (a) The consolidated district is an independent school district.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c) or by a local consolidation agreement under Section 13.158, the board of trustees of the school district having the greatest membership on the last day of the school year preceding the consolidation serves as the board of trustees of the consolidated district until the next regular election of trustees, at which time the consolidated district shall elect a board of trustees.

(c) Except as provided by a local consolidation agreement under Section 13.158, if the membership on the last day of the school year preceding the consolidation in the district with the largest membership is more than five times that of the other district or districts consolidating with it, the trustees of the district with the largest membership continue to serve for the terms for which they have been elected and only the vacancies, as they occur, are filled from the consolidated district.

(d) The powers, duties, and terms of office of the trustees are governed by Chapter 11.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.156. TITLE TO PROPERTY; ASSUMPTION OF DEBT. Title to all property of the consolidating districts vests in the consolidated district, and the consolidated district assumes and is liable for the outstanding indebtedness of the consolidating districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.157. DISSOLUTION OF CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT. (a) A consolidated school district may be dissolved by the same procedure provided for consolidation, except that it is not necessary to provide polling places in each of the former districts.

(b) If the district is dissolved, each of the former districts is restored as a separate district and classified as an independent school district.

(c) Title to property of the consolidated district that is allocated to each of the restored districts under Section 13.004 vests in the restored districts, and each of the restored districts assumes and is liable for the indebtedness of the consolidated district as allocated under that section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.158. LOCAL CONSOLIDATION AGREEMENT. (a) Before issuing an order for an election under Section 13.153, the boards of trustees of the districts to be consolidated may draft a local consolidation agreement to be submitted to the registered voters in each district. An agreement must set out the composition and method of election of the consolidated board of trustees. The identical agreement must be submitted to the registered voters of each district.

(b) A local consolidation agreement may provide the following:

(1) an effective date that is not more than one year after the date of the consolidation election;

(2) a schedule to elect the board of trustees of the consolidated district before or after the effective date of consolidation;

(3) that the consolidated district educate particular grades within the boundaries of a district being consolidated;

(4) that the consolidated district maintain a specific campus in operation;

(5) that if the votes cast in some districts, but not all districts, show a majority voting in favor of the consolidation, the districts receiving a favorable vote may consolidate;

(6) that a majority of the votes cast in each district must be in favor of consolidation for there to be a consolidation; or

(7) any other provision consistent with state and federal law.

(c) Not later than 30 days before a consolidation election is held, the boards of trustees of the districts to be consolidated may amend the local consolidation agreement. After a successful election to consolidate, the local consolidation agreement may not be amended for five years following the effective date of consolidation, unless a shorter period is set out in the agreement. After that time, the agreement may be amended only by unanimous vote of the board of trustees of the district.

(d) The commissioner may waive a requirement under this section or Section 13.159 on application of the boards of trustees of all districts proposed for consolidation.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 13.159. PUBLIC INSPECTION AND HEARING. (a) A local consolidation agreement under Section 13.158 must be made available for public inspection during regular business hours at the central administration building of each district for at least 25 days before the consolidation election.

(b) Each district shall hold a public hearing to allow interested persons to present comments related to the local consolidation agreement. If the agreement is amended following a public hearing, before the consolidation election each district shall hold another public hearing to consider the amendment.

(c) Each district shall provide notice of each public hearing to the public.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER E. ABOLITION OF INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT

Sec. 13.201. ELIGIBILITY. An independent school district may be abolished in the manner provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.202. PETITION. Abolition of an independent school district is initiated by a petition requesting an election on the question. The petition must be signed by a majority of the board of trustees of the district to be abolished and must be presented to the county judge of each county in which part of the independent school district is situated.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.203. ELECTION. (a) Each county judge receiving a valid petition shall:

(1) issue an order for an election to be held on the same day in each county; and

(2) give notice of the election.

(b) The ballot in the election shall be printed to permit voting for or against the proposition: "Abolition of the ___________ Independent School District."

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.204. ORDER ABOLISHING DISTRICT. (a) The commissioners court of each county shall canvass the returns of the election in its county.

(b) If a majority of the total votes cast in the district favor abolishing the district, each commissioners court shall declare the results. The abolition is effective only if all territory of the district is annexed to other contiguous districts.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.205. DISPOSITION OF TERRITORY; AFFAIRS OF ABOLISHED DISTRICT. (a) The property and affairs of the abolished district are governed by this section unless otherwise controlled by the manner in which the district was abolished.

(b) Each commissioners court shall annex the territory of the abolished independent school district in its county to one or more contiguous districts in the county. The commissioners court may annex territory to a school district only if the board of trustees of that district approves the annexation.

(c) Title to the real property of the abolished district vests in the district to which the property is annexed.

(d) If at the time of its abolition the independent school district does not have outstanding indebtedness, all uncollected taxes on the property of the district for the years up to and including the last day of January of the year immediately following the year in which the independent school district is abolished shall be levied and collected, at the same rate and in the same manner as authorized for the independent school district immediately before its abolition, by the school district to which the territory containing the property on which taxes are due is annexed.

(e) Each school district to which territory from the abolished district is annexed assumes and is liable for the indebtedness of the abolished district that is allocated to the district under Section 13.004.

(f) A creditor of an abolished independent school district must file the creditor's claim against the district with the commissioners court not later than the 60th day after the effective date on which the independent school district is abolished and, if the claim is not allowed, may maintain suit against the abolished independent school district as such. Suit must be brought not later than the first anniversary of the date on which the claim is disallowed. Process in a suit, if necessary, may be served on the county judge of each county in which the district was located. The county commissioners court shall defend any suit against an abolished independent school district but may settle the litigation as the commissioners court considers advisable. This section does not waive any defense available to the abolished district.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER F. OTHER BOUNDARY CHANGES

Sec. 13.231. MINOR BOUNDARY ADJUSTMENTS BY AGREEMENT. (a) Two contiguous school districts may adjust their common boundary by agreement if, at the time the agreement is executed:

(1) no child who resides in the territory that is transferred from one jurisdiction to the other is enrolled in a school of the district from which the territory is transferred; and

(2) the taxable value of the territory that is transferred from one jurisdiction to the other does not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the total taxable value of all property in the school district from which the territory is transferred.

(b) In this section, "taxable value" has the meaning assigned by Section 403.302, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER G. INCENTIVE AID PAYMENTS

Sec. 13.281. INCENTIVE AID. (a) A school district created after August 22, 1963, through consolidation may qualify for incentive aid payments from the state.

(b) A school district may not receive incentive aid payments for a period of more than 10 years.

(c) Incentive aid payments may be made only on application to the agency and in compliance with this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.282. AMOUNT; COMPUTATION. (a) The amount of incentive aid payments may not exceed the difference between:

(1) the sum of the entitlements computed under Section 48.266 that would have been paid to the districts included in the reorganized district if the districts had not been consolidated; and

(2) the amount to which the reorganized district is entitled under Section 48.266.

(b) If the reorganized district is not eligible for an entitlement under Section 48.266, the amount of the incentive aid payments may not exceed the sum of the entitlements computed under Section 48.266 for which the districts included in the reorganized district were eligible in the school year when they were consolidated.

(c) If there is a series of consolidations at intervals in compliance with this chapter, the school district last organized is eligible to receive at due times the total sum of the series of incentive aid payments as computed separately at the time of each consolidation, subject to this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.012, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 13.283. PAYMENTS REDUCED. The incentive aid payments shall be reduced in direct proportion to any reduction in the average daily attendance as determined under Section 48.005 of the reorganized school district for the preceding year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.013, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 13.284. CONDITIONS FOR PAYMENT. To receive incentive aid payments:

(1) the geographical boundaries of the proposed district must be submitted to the agency for approval; and

(2) the geographical boundaries approved by the agency must be set forth in the petition for a consolidation election, if applicable.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 13.285. COST. The cost of incentive aid payments authorized by this subchapter shall be paid from the foundation school fund.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1071, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.